Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2009.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5624. Utility reconnection fees and prohibitions.(a) Fee.--An authority or municipality may only charge a reconnection fee for a utility or service reconnection within the authority's or municipality's jurisdiction if the customer's household income is greater than 300% of the Federal poverty level.(b) Exemption.--A customer may not be required to pay a reconnection fee or an overdue balance prior to reconnection of a utility or service under the authority's or municipality's jurisdiction if:1234567891011121314151617 (1) The customer's household income is no greater than 300% of the Federal poverty level.(2) The customer and authority or municipality have entered into a repayment plan agreement to bring any arrearages current. All repayment plans must be based on the household income of the customer. Arrearage repayments shall not exceed 5% of the household monthly income of the customer.(c) Summer termination.-- An authority or municipality that provides electricity may not terminate a customer's electricity between June 1 and September 30 of each year if the customer's household income is no greater than 300% of the Federal poverty level.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2009PN2563 - 2 - 1234567891011121314